Rhode Island statutes. Title 15 Domestic Relations
Article 4 Establishment of Support Order or Determination of Parentage

15-23.1-401.
Establishment of support order.

If a support order entitled to recognition under this chapter has not been issued, a responding tribunal of this state with personal jurisdiction over the parties may issue a support order if:

The individual seeking the order resides outside this state; or

The support enforcement agency seeking the order is located outside this state.

The tribunal may issue a temporary child support order if the tribunal determined that such an order is appropriate and the individual ordered to pay is:

a presumed father of the child;

petitioning to have his paternity adjudicated;

identified as the father of the child through genetic testing;

an alleged father who has declined to submit to genetic testing;

shown by clear and convincing evidence to be the father of the child;

an acknowledged father as provided by applicable state law;

the mother of the child; or

an individual who has been ordered to pay child support in previous proceeding and the order has not been reversed or vacated.

Upon finding, after notice and opportunity to be heard, that an obligor owes a duty of support, the tribunal shall issue a support order directed to the obligor and may issue other orders pursuant to §

15-23.1-305

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1997, ch. 170, § 15; P.L. 2006, ch. 69, § 2; P.L. 2006, ch. 76, § 2; P.L. 2011, ch. 243, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 263, § 1.

15-23.1-402.
Proceeding to determine parentage.

A tribunal of this state authorized to determine parentage of a child may serve as a responding tribunal in a proceeding to determine parentage of a child brought under this act or a law or procedure substantially similar to this act.

History of Section.

P.L. 2011, ch. 243, § 3; P.L. 2011, ch. 263, § 3.